Idaho, session 2026, H0966.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Correction in the County
and Out-of-State Placement Program, $200,000 to be expended for operating
expenditures from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.